Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.800

[Art. 134] General article.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the organized militia, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a general, special or summary court-martial, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of that court. However, cognizance may not be taken of, and jurisdiction may not be extended to, the crimes of murder, manslaughter, rape, robbery, maiming, sodomy, arson, extortion, assault in the first degree, burglary, or housebreaking, jurisdiction of which is reserved to civil courts.

[ 2009 c 378 s 27; 1989 c 48 s 71; 1963 c 220 s 119.]